Hawaii statutes.
[§321-11.8] Care homes; liability
insurance; coverage. (a) All operators of adult foster homes under
section 321-11.2, adult residential care homes, assisted living facilities,
community care foster family homes as defined in section 321‑481,
developmental disabilities domiciliary homes as defined in section 321-15.9,
and expanded adult residential care homes as defined in section 321-15.1, shall
obtain and maintain the following in coverage amounts deemed sufficient and
appropriate by the department of health:

(1) Liability insurance with respect to their
operation of the homes or facilities; and

(2) Automobile liability insurance, including
adequate bodily injury liability coverage for vehicles used to transport
residents of the homes or facilities.

(b) Proof of liability insurance for both the
home or facility and for vehicles used to transport home or facility residents
as required by subsection (a) shall be verified by the department of health, or
its designee, on an annual basis.

(c) The department shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section. [L 2013, c 212, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next